Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.521

Unsettled demand for payment—Costs—Fees and expenses of counsel.

(1) The court in a proceeding commenced under RCW 25.15.516 must determine all costs of the proceeding, including the reasonable compensation and expenses of appraisers appointed by the court. The court must assess the costs against the limited liability company, except that the court may assess the costs against all or some of the dissenters, in amounts the court finds equitable, to the extent the court finds the dissenters acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith in demanding payment.

(2) The court may also assess the fees and expenses of counsel and experts for the respective parties, in amounts the court finds equitable:

(a) Against the limited liability company and in favor of any or all dissenters if the court finds the limited liability company did not substantially comply with the requirements of this article; or

(b) Against either the limited liability company or a dissenter, in favor of any other party, if the court finds that the party against whom the fees and expenses are assessed acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith with respect to the rights provided by this article.

(3) If the court finds that the services of counsel for any dissenter were of substantial benefit to other dissenters similarly situated, and that the fees for those services should not be assessed against the limited liability company, the court may award to these counsel reasonable fees to be paid out of the amounts awarded to the dissenters who were benefited.

[ 2015 c 188 s 100.]